Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2069
Internationally trained physician; participating health care entity; requirements.

A participating health care entity employing a physician practicing under a provisional or transitional license shall ensure that such physician:

(1) Is subject to, and protected by, the entity's policies regarding work hours, discrimination and harassment, and access to wellness and support services on the same basis as other physicians employed by the entity; and

(2) Receives written information at the commencement of employment regarding the policies described in subdivision (1) of this section.

Laws 2026, LB1212, § 7.
August 1, 2027